Colorado, session 2026A, HB1339.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

finds and declares that:
(a) After years of discrimination and unfair labor practices, brave
farm workers and activists organized and marched hundreds of miles to
demand fair wages, dignity, and respect. In 1975, these efforts resulted in
the California "Agricultural Labor Relations Act", which was a
groundbreaking law protecting the right of farm workers to unionize.
(b) The Farm Workers Movement achieved:
(I) The first collective bargaining agreement between farm workers
and growers in the continental United States;
(II) The first union contracts requiring rest periods, clean drinking
water, hand washing facilities, and clothing protective against pesticide
exposure;
(III) The first ban on pesticide spraying while workers were in the
fields and the first ban on dichloro-diphenyl-trichloroethane, commonly
known as DDT, and other dangerous pesticides;
(IV) The first and only performing pension plan for retired farm
workers;
(V) The first union contracts regulating safety and sanitary
conditions in farm labor camps and banning discrimination in employment
and the sexual harassment of female workers;
(VI) The abolition of the use of "el cortito", the infamous
short-handled hoe that physically disabled generations of farm workers; and
(VII) The extension of state coverage for unemployment, disability,
and workers' compensation to farm workers.
(2) The general assembly further finds and declares that:
(a) Given the deeply disturbing allegations of sexual abuse by Cesar
Chavez, the general assembly cannot, in good conscience, continue to
celebrate a state holiday that bears his name;
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1339

(b) This decision is not about erasing history or diminishing the
contributions that have shaped Latino communities across the country. It is
about honoring the courage of the girls and women, including the renowned
labor leader and co-founder of the United Farm Workers, Dolores Huerta,
who suffered in silence for decades before bravely speaking out.
(c) The general assembly acknowledges that many processes will
ensue over the coming year to consider renaming parks, buildings,
roadways, schools, and other areas across the state that bear Cesar Chavez's
name. The general assembly acknowledges and supports these efforts and
understands that further legislative action will be required to further amend
the state holiday observed on March 31 after 2027.
(3) Therefore, it is appropriate to designate March 31, 2026, and
March 31, 2027, as "Farm Workers Day" to honor the history of farm
workers and celebrate their ongoing contributions to our communities, state,
and country. The name of future observances will require additional
legislative action.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-11-112, amend (1),
(2), and (3) as follows:
24-11-112. Farm Workers Day.
(1) The thirty-first day of March in each year the same being the
anniversary of the birth of Cesar Estrada Chavez, 2026 AND 2027 shall be
known as "Cesar Chavez "FARM WORKERS Day" and appropriate
observance may be held by the public and in all public schools of the state
in tribute to his unselfish commitment to the principles of social justice and
respect for human dignity.
(2) The head of a state agency may allow an employee of the agency
to have a day off with pay on Cesar Chavez FARM WORKERS day in lieu of
any other legal holiday described in section 24-11-101 (1) that occurs in the
same state fiscal year on a weekday, other than a weekday on which an
election is held throughout the state, on which the state agency is required
to be open but on which the operations of the agency are required to be
maintained at only a minimum level.
(3) On Cesar Chavez FARM WORKERS day, each state agency shall
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1339

remain open and conduct the operations of the agency at no less than a
minimum level.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1339